Colorado statutes. TITLE 35 Agriculture
ARTICLE 2
AGRICULTURAL STATISTICS

Section

35-2-101. Information furnished - by whom.

The commissioner of agriculture, acting under the direction of the state agricultural commission in the collection of information necessary to the performance of his or her duties as such commissioner and subject to the provisions of section 24-1-136, C.R.S., in regard to publication of such information, is authorized to call upon the several state, county, city, town, and school district officers and officers of the several state institutions of education and penal and other state institutions, and it is the duty of all such officers to furnish, upon written or printed request of the commissioner, such information as may be required for properly setting forth the resources of the state and their development, upon blanks furnished by the commissioner. Each owner, operator, or manager of any manufacturing, mining, or other business establishment operating in this state, or other person having information necessary for carrying out the purposes of this article, upon the request of the commissioner, shall furnish the same upon blanks supplied by the commission. Except as otherwise provided by law, any agricultural statistics collected by any of the several state, county, city, town, school district, or institutional officers specified in this section shall be collected in accordance with the requirements of this article.

Source:

L. 19:

p. 632, § 1.

C.L.

§ 436.

CSA:

C. 84, § 8.

CRS 53:

§ 6-2-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-2-1.

L. 64:

p. 123, § 23.

L. 83:

Entire section amended, p. 842, § 69, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 1860, § 161, effective July 1.

35-2-102. Statistical reports.

It is the duty of the assessor of each county in this state, at the time of making the annual assessment of property, to collect such statistics in relation to population, farm operations, the principal farm products, agricultural resources, and livestock of the county as may be required by the commissioner of agriculture, and it is the duty of all persons within this state having information relative to such matters to give such information to the assessor upon his request therefor. The original sheets on which such statistics are collected shall be forwarded to the commissioner of agriculture as soon as they are completed, but not later than June 1 of each year, immediately following their collection. From these original sheets there shall be compiled in the office of the state agricultural commission complete reports on all subjects covered for each county in the state. The blanks to be used by county assessors in the collection of statistics required by the state agricultural commission shall be supplied by the commission, and the form thereof shall be fixed by the commissioner of agriculture, after conference with a representative of Colorado state university and with the bureau of crop estimates of the United States department of agriculture through the official representative for Colorado. This report shall be issued subject to the provisions of section 24-1-136, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 19:

p. 633, § 2.

C.L.

§ 437.

CSA:

C. 84, § 9.

CRS 53:

§ 6-2-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-2-2.

L. 64:

p. 124, § 24.

L. 83:

Entire section amended, p. 842, § 70, effective July 1.

35-2-103. Cooperation with secretary of agriculture.

To facilitate the work of collecting agricultural and livestock statistics required by this article, the commissioner of agriculture is empowered to enter into a cooperative agreement with the secretary of agriculture of the United States, or his accredited representatives, under which the facilities and information of the bureau of crop estimates of the United States department of agriculture relating to the state of Colorado are made available for the use of the state agricultural commission, and the facilities and information of said state agricultural commission are likewise made available for the use of said bureau of crop estimates.

Source:

L. 19:

p. 634, § 4.

C.L.

§ 439.

CSA:

C. 84, § 11.

CRS 53:

§ 6-2-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-2-3.

35-2-104. Failure to give information to commission - penalty.

Any person having in his possession information necessary to carrying out the purposes of this article, who fails or refuses to furnish such information to the state agricultural commission upon proper request by the commissioner of agriculture, is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not less than ten dollars nor more than five hundred dollars and costs of prosecution. Any county or state official who fails or refuses to collect or compile for the state agricultural commission such information as he is required by this article to collect and compile, when properly requested by the commissioner of agriculture so to do, and who is supplied with proper blanks for collecting and compiling the same, is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not less than twenty dollars nor more than five hundred dollars and costs of prosecution.

Source:

L. 19:

p. 634, § 6.

C.L.

§ 441.

CSA:

C. 84, § 13.

CRS 53:

§ 6-2-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-2-4.

35-2-105. Failure to give information to assessor - penalty.

Any person who is required by this article to give information to the county assessor concerning farm operations, crop production, agricultural resources, livestock, or other matters covered by this article, and who, upon proper request being made, fails, refuses, or neglects to do so, is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not less than twenty-five dollars nor more than two hundred dollars and shall pay all costs of the prosecution. All fines and penalties collected under the provisions of this article shall be paid into the school funds of the county in which such conviction is had.

Source:

L. 19:

p. 634, § 7.

C.L.

§ 442.

CSA:

C. 84, § 14.

CRS 53:

§ 6-2-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-2-5.

35-2-106. Reports confidential.

The reports made to the commissioner of agriculture by individuals, firms, or corporations, or to any of the several state, county, city, town, school district, or institutional officers specified in section 35-2-101, shall be regarded as confidential and not for the purpose of disclosing personal or corporate affairs. In the reports of the commissioner, no use shall be made of the names of individuals, firms, or corporations supplying the information called for in this article 2. Any officer or employee of the state agricultural commission disclosing such information commits a petty offense.

Source:

L. 19:

p. 635, § 8.

C.L.

§ 443.

CSA:

C. 84, § 15.

CRS 53:

§ 6-2-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-2-6.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 1860, § 162, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3276, § 615, effective March 1, 2022.

35-2-107. Contracts to remain in force.

All existing contracts and obligations of the state agricultural commission shall remain in full force and effect and shall be performed by the state agricultural commission, and particularly that certain contract entered into on April 30, 1919, by and between the state of Colorado, by its commissioner of agriculture, and the United States, by the acting secretary of agriculture of the United States, for the establishment and maintenance of a cooperative crop and livestock reporting service.

Source:

L. 35:

p. 1080, § 10.

CSA:

C. 157, § 10.

CRS 53:

§ 6-2-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 6-2-7.

35-2-108. Study of potential applications for blockchain technology in agricultural operations - authority of commissioner - report to general assembly - notice to revisor of statutes - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added, (HB 19-1247), ch. 375, p. 3399, § 1, effective August 2.

Editor's note:

Subsection (5) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2020. (See L. 2019, p. 3399.)